Washington statutes.
RCW 38.08.040

Governor may order out organized militia.

In event of war, insurrection, rebellion, invasion, tumult, riot, mob, or organized body acting together by force with intent to commit a felony or to offer violence to persons or property, or by force and violence to break and resist the laws of this state, or the United States, or in case of the imminent danger of the occurrence of any of said events, or at the lawful request of competent state or local authority in support of enforcement of controlled substance statutes, or whenever responsible civil authorities shall, for any reason, fail to preserve law and order, or protect life or property, or the governor believes that such failure is imminent, or in event of public disaster, or when otherwise required for the public health, safety, or welfare, or to perform any military duty authorized by state law, or to prepare for or recover from any of these events or the consequences thereof, the governor shall have power to order the organized militia of Washington, or any part thereof, into active service of the state to execute the laws, and to perform such duty as the governor shall deem proper.

[ 2005 c 9 s 1; 1993 c 263 s 1; 1989 c 19 s 7; 1943 c 130 s 6; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8603-6. Prior: 1917 c 107 s 7; 1913 c 66 s 2; 1909 c 134 s 15.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 9: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 28, 2005]." [ 2005 c 9 s 3.]